Nevada, session 83, AB136.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 574.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
574.053 1. Any person who knows or has reasonable cause to
believe that an animal has been subjected to an act of cruelty in
violation of NRS 574.100 may report the act of cruelty to any:
(a) Peace officer;
(b) Officer of a society for the prevention of cruelty to animals
who is authorized to make arrests pursuant to NRS 574.040; or
(c) Animal control officer.
2. Any person, law enforcement agency, society for the
prevention of cruelty to animals or animal control agency that
willfully releases data or information concerning the identity of a
person who made a report pursuant to subsection 1, except for the
purposes of a criminal investigation or prosecution, is guilty of a
misdemeanor.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the owner or
operator of a commercial establishment engaged in the business of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
selling access to live animals to interact with the public shall
conspicuously post, at the location in the commercial
establishment where payment is made, a sign that is at least 8 1/2
by 11 inches in size and which contains the following notice in
bold type:
IF YOU KNOW OR HAVE REASON TO BELIEVE
THAT AN ANIMAL IS IN DANGER OR HAS BEEN
SUBJECTED TO AN ACT OF CRUELTY IN VIOLATION
OF NRS 574.100, YOU MAY CONTACT [telephone
number for the local animal control authority].
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an owner or
operator of a commercial establishment engaged in the business of
selling access to live animals to interact with the public who fails
to conspicuously post a sign in the manner required by subsection
3 shall pay an administrative penalty of $100 for each day that the
required sign is not posted.
5. The requirements of subsection 3 do not apply to a facility
which is an accredited institutional member of the Association of
Zoos and Aquariums or its successor.
6. As used in this section, “animal control authority” means
any entity designated by the county or city to enforce local
ordinances or laws of this State relating to the control, shelter or
welfare of animals. The term includes, without limitation, an
animal control agency, a law enforcement agency or a society for
the prevention of cruelty to animals in which an officer is
authorized to make arrests pursuant to NRS 574.040.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)